District of Columbia statutes.
47-351.11

District funds reserved for certain insured institutions.

Without regard to the competitive bidding requirements of §§ 47-351.05 and 47-351.07, the Mayor, or the CFO pursuant to § 47-351.02(c), may reserve up to 10% of District funds available for deposit or investment in order to make an investment or a deposit with one or more insured financial institutions located in the District that have less than $550 million in assets. The amount available for deposit or investment is to be calculated based upon the prior year’s average investment balance. In selecting an insured financial institution under this section, the Mayor, or the CFO pursuant to § 47-351.02(c), shall follow the provisions of § 47-351.04 and shall encourage the use of women-owned banks and federally or District chartered minority-owned banks certified by the Small and Local Business Opportunity Commission in accordance with [subchapter IX-A of Chapter 2 of Title 2]. The amount of District funds deposited in any such institution shall not exceed the federally insured amount, unless the amount of District funds deposited that exceed the federally insured amount meet the collateral requirements set forth in § 47-351.08 and the permitted investment instrument provisions set forth in § 47-351.03.

Mar. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-56, § 2(c), 44 DCR 6933
October 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-169, § 8, 47 DCR 5846
Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2381(c), 52 DCR 7503
Mar. 20, 2008, D.C. Law 17-124, § 2, 55 DCR 1516
This section is referenced in § 47-351.05.
1981 Ed., § 47-351.11.
D.C. Law 13-169 authorized striking the phrase “Minority Business Opportunity Commission in accordance with § 1-1141 et seq.” and inserting the phrase “Local Business Opportunity Commission in accordance with subchapter II-B of Chapter 2 of Title 2.” in its place.
D.C. Law 16-33 substituted “Small and Local Business Opportunity Commission in accordance with subchapter IX-A if Chapter 2 of Title 2 ” for “District of Columbia Local Business Opportunity Commission in accordance with subchapter IX of Chapter 2 of Title 2”.
D.C. Law 17-124 substituted “10%” for “1%”; substituted “550” for “350”; and inserted “, unless the amount of District funds deposited that exceed the federally insured amount meet the collateral requirements set forth in § 47-351.08 and the permitted investment instrument provisions set forth in § 47-351.03”.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2381(c) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).